ru: Технология небулайзера: Струйный; Сетчатый; Поршневой; Ультразвуковой; VMT; Другой
cs: Technologie nebulizátoru: Jet; Síťovina; Pístový; Ultrazvukový; VMT; Jiné
pt-BR: Tecnologia do nebulizador: Jato; Malha; Pistão; Ultrassônico; VMT; Outro
pt-PT: Tecnologia de nebulizador: Jato; Rede; Com pistão; Ultrassónico; VMT; Outro
hr-HR: Tehnologija nebulizatora: S mlaznicom; Mrežica; Klipni; Ultrazvučni; VMT; Ostalo
ja: ネブライザー技術: ジェット; メッシュ; ピストン; 超音波; VMT; その他
fr: Technologie de nébulisation: Jet; A mailles; À piston; Ultrasonique; VMT; Autre
zh-TW: 噴霧治療器技術: 噴嘴; 網布; 活塞; 超音波; VMT; 其他
el: Τεχνολογία νεφελοποιητή: Τζετ; Πλέγμα; Εμβολοφόρος; Υπερηχητική; VMT; Άλλο
en: Nebulizer technology: Jet; Mesh; Piston; Ultrasonic; VMT; Other
zh-CN: 雾化器技术: 喷射型; 网状; 活塞; 超声波; VMT; 其他
th: เทคโนโลยีเครื่องพ่นยา: เจ็ท; ตาข่าย; เครื่องพ่นยาแบบปั๊มลูกสูบ; อัลตราโซนิก; เครื่องพ่นยาที่มีเทคโนโลยี VMT; อื่นๆ
nb: Nebulisator-teknologi: Jet; Mesh; Stempel; Ultralyd; VMT; Annet
it: Tecnologia del nebulizzatore: A getto; Mesh; A pistone; A ultrasuoni; VMT; Altro
fi: Sumutinteknologia: Suihku; Verkko; Mäntä; Ultraääni; VMT; Muu
da: Forstøverteknologi: Jet; Mesh; Stempel; Ultralyd; VMT; Andet
lt-LT: Inhaliatoriaus veikimo principas: Su purškikliu; Membraninis; Stūmoklis; Ultragarsinis; VMT; Kita
hu: Porlasztó technológiája: Sugár; Hálós; Dugattyús; Ultrahangos; VMT; Egyéb
tr: Nebulizatör Teknolojisi: Jet; Ağ; Piston; Ultrasonik; VMT; Diğer
nl: Vernevelaartechnologie: Jet; Gaas; Piston; Ultrasoon; VMT; Andere
vi: Công nghệ máy thở khí dung: Tia; Lưới; Pittông; Siêu âm; VMT; Khác
pl: Technologia nebulizatora: Dysza; Siatka; Tłok; Ultradźwiękowa; VMT; Inne
sl-SI: Tehnologija nebulatorja: Kompresijska; Mreža; Batna; Ultrazvočen; VMT; Drugo
bg-BG: Технология на пулверизатор: Струйна; Мрежа; Бутало; Ултразвук; VMT; Други
sv: Nebulisatorteknik: Jet; Mesh; Kolv; Ultraljud; VMT; Övrigt
ko: 분무기 기술: 제트; 메쉬; 피스톤; 초음파; VMT; 기타
ro-RO: Tehnologia nebulizatorului: Jet; Plasă; Piston; Ultrasonic; VMT; Altele
es: Tecnología del nebulizador: Jet; Malla; Pistón; Ultrasónico; VMT; Otros
de: Zerstäubertechnologie: Strahl; Netz; Kolben; Ultraschall; VMT; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Technológia rozprašovača: Tryskový; Sieťovina; Piestový; Ultrazvukový; VMT; Iné